Georgia statutes. TITLE 8 Buildings and Housing
PART 4 Obligations on Bonds and Leases

8-3-70.
Bonds — Power of authorities to issue bonds; types of bonds; security for bonds.

An authority shall have power to issue bonds from time to time, in its discretion, for any of its corporate purposes. An authority shall also have power to issue refunding bonds for the purpose of paying or retiring bonds previously issued by it. An authority may issue such types of bonds as it may determine, including bonds on which the principal and interest are payable:

Exclusively from the income and revenues of the housing project financed with the proceeds of such bonds, or with such proceeds together with a grant from the federal government in aid of such project;

Exclusively from the income and revenues of certain designated housing projects whether or not they were financed in whole or in part with the proceeds of such bonds; or

From its revenues generally.

Any of such bonds may be additionally secured by a pledge of any revenues or a mortgage of any housing project or projects or of any other property of the authority.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 210, § 14; Ga. L. 1939, p. 126, § 3; Ga. L. 1951, p. 127, § 3; Ga. L. 1959, p. 141, § 3; Ga. L. 1962, p. 734, § 3; Ga. L. 1971, p. 94, § 1.

8-3-71.
Bonds — Liability of commissioner, state, and political subdivisions; status of bonds in regard to constitutional and statutory debt limitations and restrictions.

Neither the commissioners of an authority nor any person executing the bonds shall be liable personally on the bonds by reason of the issuance thereof.

The bonds and other obligations of an authority shall not be a debt of the city, the county, the state, or any political subdivision of the state; and such bonds or obligations shall so state on their face. Neither the city, the county, the state, nor any political subdivision of the state shall be liable on such bonds or other obligations; nor in any event shall such bonds or obligations be payable out of any funds or properties other than those of said authority. The bonds shall not constitute an indebtedness within the meaning of any constitutional or statutory debt limitation or restriction.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 210, § 14; Ga. L. 1939, p. 126, § 3; Ga. L. 1951, p. 127, § 3; Ga. L. 1959, p. 141, § 3; Ga. L. 1962, p. 734, § 3; Ga. L. 1971, p. 94, § 1.

8-3-72.
Bonds — Exemption of bonds and interest from taxation; article as contract by housing authorities and state with bondholders and transferees.

Bonds of an authority are declared to be issued for an essential public and governmental purpose and to be public instrumentalities. All such bonds shall be exempt from state, county, municipal, or other taxation in the State of Georgia; and interest on such bonds shall be exempt from income taxation or other taxation by the State of Georgia or by any political subdivision thereof. The provisions of this article exempting from taxation both the properties of housing authorities and the bonds and interest thereon shall constitute, by virtue of this article and without the necessity of the same being restated in such bonds, a contract between the bondholders, including all transferees of such bonds, from time to time, on the one hand and the respective housing authorities issuing such bonds and the state on the other.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 210, § 14; Ga. L. 1939, p. 124, § 1.

Cross references.

Constitutional authorization for tax exemptions for public property, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. VII, Sec. II, Paras. I to IV.

8-3-73.
Bonds — Form; terms; rate of interest.

Bonds of an authority shall be authorized by its resolution and may be issued in one or more series and shall bear such date or dates; mature at such time or times; bear interest at such rate or rates; be in such denomination or denominations; be in such form, either coupon or registered; carry such conversion or registration privileges; have such rank or priority; be executed in such manner; be payable in such medium of payment, at such place or places; and be subject to such terms of redemption, with or without premium, as such resolution, its trust indenture, or mortgage may provide.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 210, § 15; Ga. L. 1939, p. 126, § 3; Ga. L. 1951, p. 127, § 3; Ga. L. 1959, p. 141, § 3; Ga. L. 1962, p. 734, § 3; Ga. L. 1970, p. 113, § 1; Ga. L. 1971, p. 94, § 1; Ga. L. 1980, p. 1094, § 1.

Cross references.

Repeal of interest rate limitations, §

36-82-123

.

8-3-74.
Bonds — Public sale of bonds; exceptions.

The bonds of an authority may be sold at public or private sale in such a manner and for such price as the authority may determine to be in the best interest of the authority.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 210, § 15; Ga. L. 1939, p. 126, § 3; Ga. L. 1951, p. 127, § 3; Ga. L. 1959, p. 141, § 3; Ga. L. 1962, p. 734, § 3; Ga. L. 1971, p. 94, § 1; Ga. L. 1980, p. 1094, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 283, § 4; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1067, § 3.

8-3-75.
Bonds — Validity of signatures; negotiability.

In case any of the commissioners or officers of the authority whose signatures appear on any bonds or coupons shall cease to be such commissioners or officers before the delivery of such bonds, such signatures shall nevertheless be valid and sufficient for all purposes, the same as if they had remained in office until such delivery. Any law to the contrary notwithstanding, any bonds issued pursuant to this article shall be fully negotiable.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 210, § 15.

8-3-76.
Bonds — Effect of recital of purpose on face of bond.

Any bond reciting in substance that it has been issued by an authority to aid in financing a housing project to provide dwelling accommodations for persons of low income shall be conclusively deemed, in any action or proceeding involving the validity or enforceability of such bond or the security therefor, to have been issued for a housing project of such character.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 210, § 15.

8-3-77.
Powers of authorities as to securing payment of bonds and lease obligations.

In connection with the issuance of bonds or the incurring of obligations under leases and in order to secure the payment of such bonds or obligations, an authority shall have power:

To pledge all or any part of its gross or net rents, fees, or revenues to which its right then exists or may thereafter come into existence;

To mortgage all or any part of its real or personal property then owned or thereafter acquired;

To covenant against pledging all or any part of its rents, fees, and revenues or against mortgaging all or any part of its real or personal property to which its right or title then exists or may thereafter come into existence or to covenant against permitting or suffering any lien on such revenues or property; to covenant with respect to limitations on its right to sell, lease, or otherwise dispose of any housing project or any part thereof; and to covenant as to what other, or additional, debts or obligations may be incurred by it;

To covenant as to the bonds to be issued and as to the issuance of such bonds in escrow or otherwise and as to the use and disposition of the proceeds thereof; to provide for the replacement of lost, destroyed, or mutilated bonds; to covenant against extending the time for the payment of its bonds or interest thereon; and to redeem the bonds, to covenant for their redemption, and to provide the terms and conditions thereof;

To covenant, subject to the limitations contained in this article, as to rents and fees to be charged in the operation of a housing project or projects, as to the amount to be raised each year or other period of time by rents, fees, and other revenues, and as to the use and disposition to be made thereof; to create or to authorize the creation of special funds for moneys held for construction or operating costs, debt service, reserves, or other purposes; and to covenant as to the use and disposition of the moneys held in such funds;

To prescribe the procedure, if any, by which the terms of any contract with bondholders may be amended or abrogated; to prescribe the amount of bonds the holders of which must consent thereto; and to prescribe the manner in which such consent may be given;

To covenant as to the use of any or all of its real or personal property; and to covenant as to the maintenance of its real and personal property, the replacement thereof, the insurance to be carried thereon, and the use and disposition of insurance moneys;

To covenant as to the rights, liabilities, powers, and duties arising upon the breach by it of any covenant, condition, or obligation; and to covenant and prescribe as to events of default and terms and conditions upon which any or all of its bonds or obligations shall become or may be declared due before maturity, and as to the terms and conditions upon which such declaration and its consequences may be waived;

To vest in a trustee or trustees or the holders of bonds or any proportion of them the right to enforce the payment of the bonds or any covenants securing or relating to the bonds; to vest in a trustee or trustees the right, in the event of a default by said authority, to take possession and use, operate, and manage any housing project or part thereof, and to collect the rents and revenues arising therefrom, and to dispose of such moneys in accordance with the agreement of the authority with said trustee; to provide for the powers and duties of a trustee or trustees and to limit the liabilities thereof; and to provide the terms and conditions upon which the trustee or trustees or the holders of bonds or any proportion of them may enforce any covenant or rights securing or relating to the bonds; and

To exercise all or any part or combination of the powers granted by this Code section; to make covenants other than and in addition to the covenants expressly authorized by this Code section, of like or different character; to make such covenants and to do any and all such acts and things as may be necessary or convenient or desirable in order to secure its bond or, in the absolute discretion of said authority, as will tend to make the bonds more marketable, notwithstanding that such covenants, acts, or things may not be enumerated in this Code section.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 210, § 16; Ga. L. 1939, p. 126, §§ 2, 3; Ga. L. 1951, p. 127, §§ 2, 3; Ga. L. 1959, p. 141, §§ 2, 3; Ga. L. 1962, p. 734, §§ 2, 3; Ga. L. 1971, p. 94, § 1.

8-3-78.
Remedies of obligee of an authority generally.

An obligee of an authority shall have the right, in addition to all other rights which may be conferred on such obligee, subject only to any contractual restrictions binding upon such obligee:

By mandamus, suit, action, or proceeding at law or in equity, to compel said authority and the commissioners, officers, agents, or employees thereof to observe each and every term, provision, and covenant contained in any contract of said authority with or for the benefit of such obligee and to require the carrying out of any or all such covenants and agreements of said authority and the fulfillment of all duties imposed upon said authority by this article; and

By suit, action, or proceeding in equity, to enjoin any acts or things which may be unlawful or the violation of any of the rights of such obligee of said authority.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 210, § 17.

8-3-79.
Additional remedies conferrable on obligee by an authority.

An authority shall have power by its resolution, trust indenture, mortgage, lease, or other contract to confer upon any obligee holding or representing a specified amount in bonds, or holding a lease, the right, in addition to all rights that may otherwise be conferred, upon the happening of an event of default as defined in such resolution or instrument, by suit, action, or proceeding in any court of competent jurisdiction:

To cause possession of any housing project or any part thereof to be surrendered to any such obligee;

To obtain the appointment of a receiver of any housing project of said authority or any part thereof and of the rents and profits therefrom. If such receiver is appointed, he may enter and take possession of such housing project or any part thereof and operate and maintain it, and collect and receive all fees, rents, revenues, or other charges thereafter arising therefrom, and shall keep such moneys in a separate account or accounts and apply the same in accordance with the obligations of said authority as the court shall direct; and

To require said authority and the commissioners thereof to account as if it and they were the trustees of an express trust.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 210, § 18; Ga. L. 1939, p. 126, §§ 2, 3; Ga. L. 1951, p. 127, §§ 2, 3; Ga. L. 1959, p. 141, §§ 2, 3; Ga. L. 1962, p. 734, §§ 2, 3; Ga. L. 1971, p. 94, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 8, § 8.

8-3-80.
Exemption of property of authorities from execution sale; charges or liens on property of authorities; enforcement of mortgages, pledges, or liens by obligees of authorities.

All real property of an authority shall be exempt from levy and sale by virtue of an execution; and no execution or other judicial process shall issue against the same nor shall any judgment against an authority be a charge or lien upon its real property, provided that this Code section shall not apply to or limit the right of obligees to foreclose or otherwise enforce any mortgage of an authority or the right of obligees to pursue any remedies for the enforcement of any pledge or lien given by an authority on its rents, fees, or revenues.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 210, § 19.

8-3-81.
Bonds and other obligations of authorities as legal investments.

Notwithstanding any restrictions on investments contained in any laws of this state, the state and all public officers, municipal corporations, political subdivisions, and public bodies; all banks, bankers, trust companies, savings banks and institutions, building and loan associations, savings and loan associations, investment companies, and other persons carrying on a banking business; all insurance companies, insurance associations, and other persons carrying on an insurance business; and all executors, administrators, guardians, trustees, and other fiduciaries may legally invest any sinking funds, moneys, or other funds belonging to them or within their control in any bonds or other obligations issued by a housing authority pursuant to this article, or issued by any public housing authority or agency in the United States, when such bonds or other obligations are secured by a pledge of annual contributions to be paid by the United States government or any agency thereof. Such bonds and other obligations shall be authorized security for all public deposits, it being the purpose of this Code section to authorize any persons, firms, corporations, associations, political subdivisions, bodies, and officers, public or private, to use any funds owned or controlled by them, including but not limited to sinking, insurance, investment, retirement, compensation, pension and trust funds, and funds held on deposit, for the purchase of any such bonds or other obligations; provided, however, that nothing contained in this Code section shall be construed as relieving any person, firm, or corporation from any duty of exercising reasonable care in selecting securities.

History.

Ga. L. 1939, p. 122, § 1; Ga. L. 1951, p. 127, § 3; Ga. L. 1959, p. 141, § 3; Ga. L. 1962, p. 734, § 3; Ga. L. 1971, p. 94, § 1; Ga. L. 1989, p. 14, § 8.